Ohio, session 136, HB620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 1321.44 be amended and sections 1317.081, 1321.142, 1321.412, 1321.593, and 1321.633 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1317.081. No retail seller shall make a retail installment sale for the purchase of a dog or cat. Any retail installment sale made in violation of this section is void, and the seller has no right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, or charges related to the sale and has no security interest in the dog or cat. Sec. 1321.142. (A) No licensee shall make a loan for the purchase, lease, or lease-purchase of a dog or cat. (B) Any loan made in violation of this prohibition is void, and the licensee has no right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, or charges related to the loan and has no security interest in the dog or cat. (C) A violation of this section is deemed an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of section 1345.02 of the Revised Code. A borrower injured by a violation of this section shall have a cause of action and be entitled to the same relief available to a consumer under section 1345.09 of the Revised Code, and all powers and remedies available to the attorney general to enforce sections 1345.01 to 1345.13 of the Revised Code are available to the attorney general to enforce this section. (D) The superintendent of financial institutions or a borrower may bring directly an action to enjoin a violation of this section. The prosecuting attorney of the county in which the action may be brought may bring an action to enjoin a violation of this section only if the prosecuting attorney first presents any evidence of the violation to the attorney general and, within a reasonable period of time, the attorney general has not agreed to bring the action. Sec. 1321.412. No licensee shall make a loan for the purchase, lease, or lease-purchase of a dog or cat. Any loan made in violation of this prohibition is void, and the licensee has no right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, or charges related to the loan and has no security interest in the dog or cat. Sec. 1321.44. (A) A violation of section 1321.41 or 1321.412 of the Revised Code is deemed an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of section 1345.02 of the Revised Code. A borrower injured by a violation of section 1321.41 or 1321.412 of the Revised Code shall have a cause of action and be entitled to the same relief available to a consumer under section 1345.09 of the Revised Code, and all powers and remedies available to the attorney general to enforce sections 1345.01 to 1345.13 of the Revised Code are available to the attorney general to enforce section 1321.41 or 1321.412 of the Revised Code. (B) The superintendent of financial institutions or a borrower may bring directly an action to enjoin a violation of sections 1321.35 to 1321.48 of the Revised Code. The prosecuting attorney of the county in which the action may be brought may bring an action to enjoin a violation of sections 1321.35 to 1321.48 of the Revised Code only if the prosecuting attorney first presents any evidence of the violation to the attorney general and, within a reasonable period of time, the attorney general has not agreed to bring the action. (C) The superintendent may initiate criminal proceedings under sections 1321.35 to 1321.48 of the Revised Code by presenting any evidence of criminal violation to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offense may be prosecuted. If the prosecuting attorney does not prosecute the violations, or at the request of the prosecuting attorney, the superintendent shall present any evidence of criminal violations to the attorney general, who may proceed in the prosecution with all the rights, privileges, and powers conferred by law on prosecuting attorneys, including the power to appear before grand juries and to interrogate witnesses before such grand juries. These powers of the attorney general are in addition to any other applicable powers of the attorney general. (D) The prosecuting attorney of the county in which an alleged offense may be prosecuted may initiate criminal proceedings under sections 1321.35 to 1321.48 of the Revised Code. (E) In order to initiate criminal proceedings under sections 1321.35 to 1321.48 of the Revised Code, the attorney general first shall present any evidence of criminal violations to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the alleged offense may be prosecuted. If, within a reasonable period of time, the prosecuting attorney has not agreed to prosecute the violations, the attorney general may proceed in the prosecution with all the rights, privileges, and powers described in division (B) of this section. (F) When a judgment under this section becomes final, the clerk of court shall mail a copy of the judgment, including supporting opinions, to the superintendent. Sec. 1321.593. No registrant shall make a loan for the purchase, lease, or lease-purchase of a dog or cat. Any loan made in violation of this prohibition is void, and the registrant has no right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, or charges related to the loan and has no security interest in the dog or cat. Sec. 1321.633. No licensee shall make a loan for the purchase, lease, or lease-purchase of a dog or cat. Any loan made in violation of this prohibition is void, and the licensee has no right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, or charges related to the loan and has no security interest in the dog or cat. Section 2. That existing section 1321.44 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.